District of Columbia statutes.
47-113

Deputy Disbursing Officer and assistant disbursing officers — Appointment.

The Mayor of the District of Columbia shall appoint a Deputy Disbursing Officer of the District of Columbia and such assistant disbursing officers of the District of Columbia as he may, in his discretion and subject to available appropriations, consider necessary, such Deputy Disbursing Officer and assistant disbursing officers to be subordinated to the Disbursing Officer, District of Columbia.

July 30, 1951, 65 Stat. 127, ch. 250, § 1
Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 3205(q), 25 DCR 5740
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Merit system, effective date provisions, see § 1-636.02.
This section is referenced in § 1-636.02.
1981 Ed., § 47-113.
1973 Ed., § 47-113a.
Disbursing Office abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 47-111.